dev/mt_brokenplurals/appendix1.dix
    <pardef n="q/anpiena__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>anpiena</l><r>anpiena<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>niepel</l><r>anpiena<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ż/arżur__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>arżur</l><r>arżur<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rażar</l><r>arżur<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rieżer</l><r>arżur<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="t/arf__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>arf</l><r>arf<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ruf</l><r>arf<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ċ/appetta__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>appetta</l><r>appetta<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>piepet</l><r>appetta<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="/aħmar__adj_GD">
      <e><p><l>aħmar</l><r>aħmar<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ħomor</l><r>aħmar<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ġ/ewnaħ__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>ewnaħ</l><r>ewnaħ<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>wienaħ</l><r>ewnaħ<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ħ/abel__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>abel</l><r>abel<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>bula</l><r>abel<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="k/elma__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>elma</l><r>elma<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>liem</l><r>elma<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ħ/anżir__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>anżir</l><r>anżir<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nieżer</l><r>anżir<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="/isfar__adj_GD">
      <e><p><l>isfar</l><r>isfar<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sofor</l><r>isfar<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ġ/akketta__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>akketta</l><r>akketta<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kieket</l><r>akketta<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ċ/uċ__adj_GD">
      <e><p><l>uċ</l><r>uċ<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>wieċ</l><r>uċ<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="por/ga__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>ga</l><r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>og</l><r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="b/ejt__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>ejt</l><r>ejt<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>jut</l><r>ejt<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="g/endus__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>endus</l><r>endus<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>niedes</l><r>endus<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="t/arbija__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>arbija</l><r>arbija<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rabi</l><r>arbija<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ħ/afif__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>afif</l><r>afif<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>fief</l><r>afif<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="d/orbies__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>orbies</l><r>orbies<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rabes</l><r>orbies<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>riebes</l><r>orbies<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="r/iefnu__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>iefnu</l><r>iefnu<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>wiefen</l><r>iefnu<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="wer/c__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>c</l><r>c<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ec</l><r>c<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="b/uz__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>uz</l><r>uz<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>wiez</l><r>uz<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="r/eġina__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>eġina</l><r>eġina<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ġejjen</l><r>eġina<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="f/orn__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>orn</l><r>orn<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ran</l><r>orn<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="għ/axra__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>axra</l><r>axra<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>exieren</l><r>axra<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="s/uffara__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>uffara</l><r>uffara<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>fafar</l><r>uffara<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="r/ukkell__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>ukkell</l><r>ukkell<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kiekel</l><r>ukkell<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ls/ien__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>ien</l><r>ien<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ina</l><r>ien<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="sk/arpan__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>arpan</l><r>arpan<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rapan</l><r>arpan<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rapen</l><r>arpan<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="d/ejjaq__adj_GD">
      <e><p><l>ejjaq</l><r>ejjaq<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ojoq</l><r>ejjaq<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="s/idrija__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>idrija</l><r>idrija<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>dieri</l><r>idrija<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="b/ilbla__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>ilbla</l><r>ilbla<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>liebel</l><r>ilbla<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ħ/obla__adj_GD">
      <e><p><l>obla</l><r>obla<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>biel</l><r>obla<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>biela</l><r>obla<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>bieli</l><r>obla<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="tar/ġa__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>ġa</l><r>ġa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ag</l><r>ġa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="/wieħed__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>wieħed</l><r>wieħed<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uħud</l><r>wieħed<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="l/eħen__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>eħen</l><r>eħen<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iħna</l><r>eħen<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ċ/int__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>int</l><r>int<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nut</l><r>int<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="t/ifel__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>ifel</l><r>ifel<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>fal</l><r>ifel<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="q/alb__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>alb</l><r>alb<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lub</l><r>alb<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="porga"><i>por</i><par n="por/ga__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="suffara"><i>s</i><par n="s/uffara__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ċuċ"><i>ċ</i><par n="ċ/uċ__adj_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="isfar"><i></i><par n="/isfar__adj_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="dorbies"><i>d</i><par n="d/orbies__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="reġina"><i>r</i><par n="r/eġina__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="dejjaq"><i>d</i><par n="d/ejjaq__adj_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ħabel"><i>ħ</i><par n="ħ/abel__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="tarġa"><i>tar</i><par n="tar/ġa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="għaxra"><i>għ</i><par n="għ/axra__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ħobla"><i>ħ</i><par n="ħ/obla__adj_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="werc"><i>wer</i><par n="wer/c__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ħafif"><i>ħ</i><par n="ħ/afif__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="bejt"><i>b</i><par n="b/ejt__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="gendus"><i>g</i><par n="g/endus__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="qalb"><i>q</i><par n="q/alb__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="skarpan"><i>sk</i><par n="sk/arpan__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="lsien"><i>ls</i><par n="ls/ien__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="wieħed"><i></i><par n="/wieħed__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="tifel"><i>t</i><par n="t/ifel__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="rukkell"><i>r</i><par n="r/ukkell__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ġewnaħ"><i>ġ</i><par n="ġ/ewnaħ__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="riefnu"><i>r</i><par n="r/iefnu__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="tarbija"><i>t</i><par n="t/arbija__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="żarżur"><i>ż</i><par n="ż/arżur__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="leħen"><i>l</i><par n="l/eħen__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ħanżir"><i>ħ</i><par n="ħ/anżir__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ġakketta"><i>ġ</i><par n="ġ/akketta__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ċappetta"><i>ċ</i><par n="ċ/appetta__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="aħmar"><i></i><par n="/aħmar__adj_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="żejt"><i>ż</i><par n="b/ejt__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="buz"><i>b</i><par n="b/uz__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="forn"><i>f</i><par n="f/orn__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ċint"><i>ċ</i><par n="ċ/int__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="sidrija"><i>s</i><par n="s/idrija__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="bilbla"><i>b</i><par n="b/ilbla__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="qanpiena"><i>q</i><par n="q/anpiena__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="kelma"><i>k</i><par n="k/elma__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="tarf"><i>t</i><par n="t/arf__n_GD"/></e>
